Massachusetts, session 194th, H3581.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
SECTION 1. It is hereby found and declared that electrical load aggregation programs
empower municipalities to create new electricity supply offerings that provide customized
solutions addressing their consumers’ needs and reflecting the municipality’s capabilities. Such
solutions may provide benefits including, but not limited to, electricity cost control, reduction of
greenhouse gas emissions, support for renewable energy development and facilitation of
beneficial electrification. Further, electrical load aggregation programs may provide residential
and small business consumers access to solutions that they could not find otherwise. For
municipalities to effectively offer such solutions, they must be empowered both to create and
adapt their electrical load aggregation programs in a timely manner and to communicate with the
electricity consumers within their community using methods that reflect local needs and
preferences. Therefore, it is found that it is in the public interest to promote electrical load
aggregation programs through enactment of the following statutory changes.
of 4

SECTION 2. Section 7, clause twenty-six of chapter 4 of the General Laws, as appearing
in the 2022 official edition, is hereby amended by inserting the following:
(w) All data associated with an individual electricity consumer obtained by a public
aggregator, as defined in section 1 of Chapter 164.
SECTION 3. Section 134 of chapter 164 of the General Laws, as appearing in the 2022
official edition, is hereby amended by striking out subsection (a) paragraph 6 and inserting in
place thereof the following:
It shall be the duty of the aggregated entity to fully inform participating ratepayers in
advance of automatic enrollment that they are to be automatically enrolled and that they have the
right to opt-out of the aggregated entity without penalty. In addition, such disclosure shall
prominently state all charges to be made and shall include full disclosure of the basic service
rate, how to access it, and the fact that it is available to them without penalty. The department of
energy resources shall furnish, without charge, to any citizen a list of all other supply options
available to them in a meaningful format that shall enable comparison of price and product. After
obtaining approval of its plan, the aggregated entity may deliver information and educational
materials regarding its program to each consumer within the municipality or municipalities. To
enable such delivery, the electric distribution company shall provide to such aggregated entity a
current list of the names, mailing addresses, email addresses, service addresses and rate classes
of all electric consumers taking distribution service within the municipality or municipalities. To
facilitate the automatic enrollment and ratepayer notification, the electric distribution company
shall identify in such data all electric accounts within the municipality that are not otherwise
receiving generation service from a competitive supplier and provide such additional consumer
of 4

information necessary for such automatic enrollment; provided, however, that any customer may
request that their name, mailing address and account number not be shared with the municipality.
To monitor program participation, the electric distribution company shall identify in such data
those consumers that are participating in the electrical load aggregation program. To enable
development of and bidding for electric energy and energy-related services, the electric
distribution company shall provide all historical usage and demand information, including
advanced metering data if collected by the consumer’s meter, for the preceding 24 months for
consumers eligible for automatic enrollment as well as for participating consumers. The
aggregated entity may use such data only in connection with the aggregation program and for no
other purpose. Further, the aggregated entity may only use email addresses provided in such data
for communications on behalf of the electrical load aggregation program. All data associated
with an individual electricity consumer obtained by the aggregated entity shall be exempt from
the definition of a “public record” under M.G.L. c.4 §7 and the aggregated entity shall protect
such data as confidential. The aggregated entity shall not share, disclose, or otherwise make
accessible to any third party, including any municipal government, such data except where
directly necessary in its implementation of the electrical load aggregation program and where
subject to non-disclosure requirements.
SECTION 4. Section 116C of chapter 164 of the General Laws, as appearing in the 2024
official edition, is hereby amended by striking out subsection (b) and inserting in place thereof
the following:
(b) A supplier or other third party shall be entitled to access detailed advanced metering
infrastructure customer data from the centralized data repository, subject to appropriate customer
approval and protections. For the avoidance of doubt, municipal aggregators may access detailed
of 4

advanced metering data about individual accounts enrolled with the municipal aggregation and
eligible for automatic enrollment. Advanced metering infrastructure data may include, but shall
not be limited to, customer billing period usage data, peak demand, supplier information and
relevant account information.
SECTION 5. Section 1D of chapter 164 of the General Laws, as appearing in the 2022
official edition, is hereby amended by inserting in line 22 after the word “parties.” the following:
The single bill option from electric utilities shall be available to all non-utility suppliers
as rate-ready, in which the utility calculates the energy-related charges based on supplier-
provided inputs for agreed upon parameters. At such time that rate-ready billing for advanced
metering infrastructure is available, the single bill option from electric utilities shall also be
available as bill-ready, in which the utility provides the supplier with metered usage and the
supplier calculates the energy-related charges and provides such charges to the utility. The bill-
ready single bill shall be available only to supply contracts for municipal aggregators and for
large commercial and industrial customers.
of 4